Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF4646.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [120B.093] STATISTICS LITERACY SEAL. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Seals established. new text end new text begin (a) Voluntary state statistics literacy seals are established to recognize graduating high school students in any school district, charter school, or nonpublic school who demonstrate particular levels of proficiency in statistics. A student is eligible for a seal if the student demonstrates proficiency in statistics and data interpretation by obtaining a qualifying score on an assessment adopted by the student's enrolling district or school, and satisfies all required standards or credit requirements related to statistics. new text end new text begin (b) School districts and charter schools must maintain appropriate records to identify high school students eligible to receive the state seals upon graduation. The school district or charter school must notate the appropriate seal to the transcript of each high school student who meets the requirements of this section and may affix the seal to the student's diploma. A school district or charter school must not charge the high school student a fee for this seal. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Assessment. new text end new text begin By August 1, 2027, the commissioner of education must identify assessments aligned with the Guidelines for Assessment and Instruction in Statistics Education II that districts may use to determine whether a student demonstrates proficiency in statistics and data interpretation, and identify levels of proficiency based on performance on each assessment. A school district or charter school is not required to use an assessment identified by the commissioner to determine whether a student has demonstrated proficiency in statistics. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin College credits. new text end new text begin By August 1, 2028, the colleges and universities of the Minnesota State Colleges and Universities system must establish criteria to translate the seals into college credits and, upon request from an enrolled student, may award credit in statistics to a student who received a statistics literacy seal under this section. A student who demonstrated the requisite level of proficiency in statistics literacy in grade 10, 11, or 12 to receive a seal and who is enrolled in a Minnesota State Colleges and Universities institution must request college credits for the student's seal within three academic years after graduating from high school. The University of Minnesota is encouraged to award students statistics credits consistent with this subdivision. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective July 1, 2026. new text end